Idaho, session 2026, S1383.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Veterans Services the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
Veterans Home Endowment Income
Fund $124,800 $618,800 $743,600
Federal Grant
Fund 0 220,000 220,000
TOTAL $124,800 $838,800 $963,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other appropriation provided by law to
the contrary, the appropriation made to the Division of Veterans Services is
hereby reduced by $51,000 for operating expenditures from the Federal Grant
Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Division of Veterans Services any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the division from the Federal Grant
Fund for fiscal year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related
to the replacement of the state veterans home in Boise and the renovation of
the state veterans home in Lewiston for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropri-
ation amounts, by fund and expense class, with the Legislative Services Of-
fice prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.